Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.060

Board—Officers, quorum.

(1) The board shall elect a chairperson of the board annually. The same person may not hold the office of chairperson for more than three years in succession.

(2) A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

[ 2022 c 240 s 21; 1995 c 1 s 7 (Initiative Measure No. 607, approved November 8, 1994).]